Texas, session 891, HB102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 25.1102(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, a county court at law in Hidalgo County has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in: (1)  family law cases and proceedings; [and] (2)  civil cases; and (3)  criminal cases for an offense punishable as a state jail felony [in which the matter in controversy does not exceed $750,000, excluding interest, statutory or punitive damages and penalties, and attorney's fees and costs, as alleged on the page of the petition]. SECTION 2.  Section 25.1102(a), Government Code, as amended by this Act, applies only to an action filed in a county court at law in Hidalgo County on or after the effective date of this Act.  An action filed in a county court at law in Hidalgo County before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the action was filed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.